Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5031.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 402. As used in this part:
(a) "Advance" means a transfer of funds made by a municipality
to an authority or to another person on behalf of the authority in
anticipation of repayment by the authority. Evidence of the intent
to repay an advance includes, but is not limited to, an executed
agreement to repay, provisions contained in a tax increment
financing plan approved before the advance, or a resolution of the
authority or the municipality.
ERE H03268'25 (H-2) hdyn9x


(b) "Alternative energy technology" means equipment, component
parts, materials, electronic devices, testing equipment, and
related systems that are specifically designed, specifically
fabricated, and used primarily for 1 or more of the following:
(i) The storage, generation, reformation, or distribution of
clean fuels integrated within an alternative energy system or
alternative energy vehicle, not including an anaerobic digester
energy system or a hydroelectric energy system, for use within the
alternative energy system or alternative energy vehicle.
(ii) The process of generating and putting into a usable form
the energy generated by an alternative energy system. Alternative
energy technology does not include those component parts of an
alternative energy system that are required regardless of the
energy source.
(iii) Research and development of an alternative energy vehicle.
(iv) Research, development, and manufacturing of an alternative
energy system.
(v) Research, development, and manufacturing of an anaerobic
digester energy system.
(vi) Research, development, and manufacturing of a
hydroelectric energy system.
(c) "Alternative energy technology business" means a business
engaged in the research, development, or manufacturing of
alternative energy technology or a business located in an authority
district that includes a military installation that was operated by
the United States Department of Defense and closed after 1980.
(d) "Assessed value" means 1 of the following:
(i) For valuations made before January 1, 1995, the state
equalized valuation as determined under the general property tax
ERE H03268'25 (H-2) hdyn9x


act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.1 to 211.155.
(ii) For valuations made after December 31, 1994, the taxable
value as determined under section 27a of the general property tax
act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.27a.
(e) "Authority" means a local development finance authority
created under this part.
(f) "Authority district" means an area or areas within which
an authority exercises its powers.
(g) "Board" means the governing body of an authority.
(h) "Business development area" means an area designated as a
certified industrial park under this part before June 29, 2000, or
an area designated in the tax increment financing plan that meets
all of the following requirements:
(i) The area is zoned to allow its use for eligible property.
(ii) The area has a site plan or plat approved by the city,
village, or township in which the area is located.
(i) "Business incubator" means real and personal property that
meets all of the following requirements:
(i) Is located in a certified technology park or a certified
alternative energy park.
(ii) Is subject to an agreement under section 412a or 412c.
(iii) Is developed for the primary purpose of attracting 1 or
more owners or tenants who will engage in activities that would
each separately qualify the property as eligible property under
subdivision (s)(iii).
(j) "Captured assessed value" means the amount in any 1 year
by which the current assessed value of the eligible property
identified in the tax increment financing plan or, for a certified
technology park, a certified alternative energy park, or a next
ERE H03268'25 (H-2) hdyn9x


Michigan development area, the real and personal property included
in the tax increment financing plan, including the current assessed
value of property for which specific local taxes are paid in lieu
of property taxes as determined pursuant to subdivision (hh),
exceeds the initial assessed value. The state tax commission shall
prescribe the method for calculating captured assessed value.
Except as otherwise provided in this part, tax abated property in a
renaissance zone as defined under section 3 of the Michigan
renaissance zone act, 1996 PA 376, MCL 125.2683, must be excluded
from the calculation of captured assessed value to the extent that
the property is exempt from ad valorem property taxes or specific
local taxes.
(k) "Certified alternative energy park" means that portion of
an authority district designated by a written agreement entered
into under section 412c between the authority, the municipality or
municipalities, and the Michigan economic development corporation.
(l) "Certified business park" means a business development area
that has been designated by the Michigan economic development
corporation as meeting criteria established by the Michigan
economic development corporation. The criteria shall establish
standards for business development areas including, but not limited
to, use, types of building materials, landscaping, setbacks,
parking, storage areas, and management.
(m) "Certified technology park" means that portion of the
authority district designated by a written agreement entered into
under section 412a between the authority, the municipality, and the
Michigan economic development corporation.
(n) "Chief executive officer" means the mayor or city manager
of a city, the president of a village, or, for other local units of
ERE H03268'25 (H-2) hdyn9x


government or school districts, the person charged by law with the
supervision of the functions of the local unit of government or
school district.
(o) "Development plan" means that information and those
requirements for a development set forth in section 415.
(p) "Development program" means the implementation of a
development plan.
(q) "Eligible advance" means an advance made before August 19,
1993.
(r) "Eligible obligation" means an obligation issued or
incurred by an authority or by a municipality on behalf of an
authority before August 19, 1993 and its subsequent refunding by a
qualified refunding obligation. Eligible obligation includes an
authority's written agreement entered into before August 19, 1993
to pay an obligation issued after August 18, 1993 and before
December 31, 1996 by another entity on behalf of the authority.
(s) "Eligible property" means land improvements, buildings,
structures, and other real property, and machinery, equipment,
furniture, and fixtures, or any part or accessory of these items
whether completed or in the process of construction comprising an
integrated whole, located within an authority district, of which
the primary purpose and use is or will be 1 of the following:
(i) The manufacture of goods or materials or the processing of
goods or materials by physical or chemical change.
(ii) Agricultural processing.
(iii) A high technology high-technology activity.
(iv) The production of energy by the processing of goods or
materials by physical or chemical change by a small power
production facility as defined by the Federal Energy Regulatory
ERE H03268'25 (H-2) hdyn9x


Commission under the public utility regulatory policies act of
1978, Public Law 95-617, which facility is fueled primarily by
biomass or wood waste. This part does not affect a person's rights
or liabilities under law with respect to groundwater contamination
described in this subparagraph. This subparagraph applies only if
all of the following requirements are met:
(A) Tax increment revenues captured from the eligible property
will be used to finance, or will be pledged for debt service on tax
increment bonds used to finance, a public facility in or near the
authority district designed to reduce, eliminate, or prevent the
spread of identified soil and groundwater contamination, pursuant
to law.
(B) The board of the authority exercising powers within the
authority district where the eligible property is located adopted
an initial tax increment financing plan between January 1, 1991 and
May 1, 1991.
(C) The municipality that created the authority establishes a
special assessment district whereby not less than 50% of the
operating expenses of the public facility described in this
subparagraph will be paid for by special assessments. Not less than
50% of the amount specially assessed against all parcels in the
special assessment district must be assessed against parcels owned
by parties potentially responsible for the identified groundwater
contamination pursuant to law.
(v) A business incubator.
(vi) An alternative energy technology business.
(vii) A transit-oriented facility.
(viii) A transit-oriented development.
(ix) An eligible next Michigan business, as that term is
ERE H03268'25 (H-2) hdyn9x


defined in section 3 of the Michigan economic growth authority act,
1995 PA 24, MCL 207.803, and other businesses within a next
Michigan development area, but only to the extent designated as
eligible property within a development plan approved by a next
Michigan development corporation.
(t) "Fiscal year" means the fiscal year of the authority.
(u) "Governing body" means, except as otherwise provided in
this subdivision, the elected body having legislative powers of a
municipality creating an authority under this part. For a next
Michigan development corporation, governing body means the
executive committee of the next Michigan development corporation,
unless otherwise provided in the interlocal agreement or articles
of incorporation creating the next Michigan development corporation
or the governing body of an eligible urban entity or its designee
as provided in the next Michigan development act, 2010 PA 275, MCL
125.2951 to 125.2959.
(v) "High-technology activity" means that term as defined in
section 3 of the Michigan economic growth authority act, 1995 PA
24, MCL 207.803.
(w) "Initial assessed value" means the assessed value of the
eligible property identified in the tax increment financing plan
or, for a certified technology park, a certified alternative energy
park, or a next Michigan development area, the assessed value of
any real and personal property included in the tax increment
financing plan, when the resolution establishing the tax increment
financing plan is approved as shown by the most recent assessment
roll for which equalization has been completed when the resolution
is adopted or, for property that becomes eligible property in other
than a certified technology park or a certified alternative energy
ERE H03268'25 (H-2) hdyn9x


park after the date the plan is approved, when the property becomes
eligible property. Property exempt from taxation when the initial
assessed value is determined must be included as zero. Property for
which a specific local tax is paid in lieu of property tax is not
considered exempt from taxation. The initial assessed value of
property for which a specific local tax was paid in lieu of
property tax is determined as provided in subdivision (hh).
(x) "Michigan economic development corporation" means the
public body corporate created under section 28 of article VII of
the state constitution of 1963 and the urban cooperation act of
1967, 1967 (Ex Sess) PA 7, MCL 124.501 to 124.512, by a contractual
interlocal agreement effective April 5, 1999 between local
participating economic development corporations formed under the
economic development corporations act, 1974 PA 338, MCL 125.1601 to
125.1636, and the Michigan strategic fund. If the Michigan economic
development corporation is unable for any reason to perform its
duties under this part, those duties may be exercised by the
Michigan strategic fund.
(y) "Michigan strategic fund" means the Michigan strategic
fund as described in the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270,
MCL 125.2001 to 125.2094.
(z) "Municipality" means a city, village, or urban township.
However, for purposes of creating and operating a certified
alternative energy park or a certified technology park,
municipality includes townships that are not urban townships.
(aa) "Next Michigan development area" means a portion of an
authority district designated by a next Michigan development
corporation under section 412e to which a development plan is
applicable.
ERE H03268'25 (H-2) hdyn9x


(bb) "Next Michigan development corporation" means that term
as defined in section 3 of the next Michigan development act, 2010
PA 275, MCL 125.2953.
(cc) "Obligation" means a written promise to pay, whether
evidenced by a contract, agreement, lease, sublease, bond, or note,
or a requirement to pay imposed by law. An obligation does not
include a payment required solely because of default on an
obligation, employee salaries, or consideration paid for the use of
municipal offices. An obligation does not include those bonds that
have been economically defeased by refunding bonds issued under
this part. Obligation includes, but is not limited to, the
following:
(i) A requirement to pay proceeds derived from ad valorem
property taxes or taxes levied in lieu of ad valorem property
taxes.
(ii) A management contract or a contract for professional
services.
(iii) A payment required on a contract, agreement, bond, or note
if the requirement to make or assume the payment arose before
August 19, 1993.
(iv) A requirement to pay or reimburse a person for the cost of
insurance for, or to maintain, property subject to a lease, land
contract, purchase agreement, or other agreement.
(v) A letter of credit, paying agent, transfer agent, bond
registrar, or trustee fee associated with a contract, agreement,
bond, or note.
(dd) "On behalf of an authority", in relation to an eligible
advance made by a municipality or an eligible obligation or other
protected obligation issued or incurred by a municipality, means in
ERE H03268'25 (H-2) hdyn9x


anticipation that an authority would transfer tax increment
revenues or reimburse the municipality from tax increment revenues
in an amount sufficient to fully make payment required by the
eligible advance made by a municipality, or eligible obligation or
other protected obligation issued or incurred by the municipality,
if the anticipation of the transfer or receipt of tax increment
revenues from the authority is pursuant to or evidenced by 1 or
more of the following:
(i) A reimbursement agreement between the municipality and an
authority it established.
(ii) A requirement imposed by law that the authority transfer
tax increment revenues to the municipality.
(iii) A resolution of the authority agreeing to make payments to
the incorporating unit.
(iv) Provisions in a tax increment financing plan describing
the project for which the obligation was incurred.
(ee) "Other protected obligation" means:
(i) A qualified refunding obligation issued to refund an
obligation described in subparagraph (ii) or (iii), an obligation that
is not a qualified refunding obligation that is issued to refund an
eligible obligation, or a qualified refunding obligation issued to
refund an obligation described in this subparagraph.
(ii) An obligation issued or incurred by an authority or by a
municipality on behalf of an authority after August 19, 1993, but
before December 31, 1994, to finance a project described in a tax
increment finance plan approved by the municipality in accordance
with this part before August 19, 1993, for which a contract for
final design is entered into by the municipality or authority
before March 1, 1994.
ERE H03268'25 (H-2) hdyn9x


(iii) An obligation incurred by an authority or municipality
after August 19, 1993, to reimburse a party to a development
agreement entered into by a municipality or authority before August
19, 1993, for a project described in a tax increment financing plan
approved in accordance with this part before August 19, 1993, and
undertaken and installed by that party in accordance with the
development agreement.
(iv) An ongoing management or professional services contract
with the governing body of a county that was entered into before
March 1, 1994 and that was preceded by a series of limited term
management or professional services contracts with the governing
body of the county, the last of which was entered into before
August 19, 1993.
(ff) "Public facility" means 1 or more of the following:
(i) A street, road, bridge, storm water or sanitary sewer,
sewage treatment facility, facility designed to reduce, eliminate,
or prevent the spread of identified soil or groundwater
contamination, drainage system, retention basin, pretreatment
facility, waterway, waterline, water storage facility, rail line,
electric, gas, telephone or other communications, or any other type
of utility line or pipeline, transit-oriented facility, transit-
oriented development, or other similar or related structure or
improvement, together with necessary easements for the structure or
improvement. Except for rail lines, utility lines, or pipelines,
the structures or improvements described in this subparagraph must
be either owned or used by a public agency, functionally connected
to similar or supporting facilities owned or used by a public
agency, or designed and dedicated to use by, for the benefit of, or
for the protection of the health, welfare, or safety of the public
ERE H03268'25 (H-2) hdyn9x


generally, whether or not used by a single business entity. Any
road, street, or bridge must be continuously open to public access.
A public facility must be located on public property or in a
public, utility, or transportation easement or right-of-way.
(ii) The acquisition and disposal of land that is proposed or
intended to be used in the development of eligible property or an
interest in that land, demolition of structures, site preparation,
and relocation costs.
(iii) All administrative and real and personal property
acquisition and disposal costs related to a public facility
described in subparagraphs (i) and (iv), including, but not limited
to, architect's, engineer's, legal, and accounting fees as
permitted by the district's development plan.
(iv) An improvement to a facility used by the public or a
public facility as those terms are defined in section 1 of 1966 PA
1, MCL 125.1351, which improvement is made to comply with the
barrier free design requirements of the state construction code
promulgated under the Stille-DeRossett-Hale single state
construction code act, 1972 PA 230, MCL 125.1501 to 125.1531.
(v) All of the following costs approved by the Michigan
economic development corporation:
(A) Operational costs and the costs related to the
acquisition, improvement, preparation, demolition, disposal,
construction, reconstruction, remediation, rehabilitation,
restoration, preservation, maintenance, repair, furnishing, and
equipping of land and other assets that are or may become eligible
for depreciation under the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 1
to 9834, for a business incubator located in a certified technology
park or certified alternative energy park.
ERE H03268'25 (H-2) hdyn9x


(B) Costs related to the acquisition, improvement,
preparation, demolition, disposal, construction, reconstruction,
remediation, rehabilitation, restoration, preservation,
maintenance, repair, furnishing, and equipping of land and other
assets that, if privately owned, would be eligible for depreciation
under the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 1 to 9834, for
laboratory facilities, research and development facilities,
conference facilities, teleconference facilities, testing, training
facilities, and quality control facilities that are or that support
eligible property under subdivision (s)(iii), that are owned by a
public entity, and that are located within a certified technology
park.
(C) Costs related to the acquisition, improvement,
preparation, demolition, disposal, construction, reconstruction,
remediation, rehabilitation, restoration, preservation,
maintenance, repair, furnishing, and equipping of land and other
assets that, if privately owned, would be eligible for depreciation
under the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 1 to 9834, for
facilities that are or that will support eligible property under
subdivision (s)(vi), that have been or will be owned by a public
entity when the costs are incurred, that are located within a
certified alternative energy park, and that have been or will be
conveyed, by gift or sale, by the public entity to an alternative
energy technology business.
(vi) Operating and planning costs included in a plan under
section 412(1)(f), including costs of marketing property within the
district and attracting development of eligible property within the
district.
(gg) "Qualified refunding obligation" means an obligation
ERE H03268'25 (H-2) hdyn9x


issued or incurred by an authority or by a municipality on behalf
of an authority to refund an obligation if the refunding obligation
meets both of the following:
(i) The net present value of the principal and interest to be
paid on the refunding obligation, including the cost of issuance,
will be less than the net present value of the principal and
interest to be paid on the obligation being refunded, as calculated
using a method approved by the department of treasury.
(ii) The net present value of the sum of the tax increment
revenues described in subdivision (jj)(ii) and the distributions
under section 411a to repay the refunding obligation will not be
greater than the net present value of the sum of the tax increment
revenues described in subdivision (jj)(ii) and the distributions
under section 411a to repay the obligation being refunded, as
calculated using a method approved by the department of treasury.
(hh) "Specific local taxes" means a tax levied under 1974 PA
198, MCL 207.551 to 207.572, the obsolete property rehabilitation
act, 2000 PA 146, MCL 125.2781 to 125.2797, the commercial
redevelopment act, 1978 PA 255, MCL 207.651 to 207.668, the
enterprise zone act, 1985 PA 224, MCL 125.2101 to 125.2123, 1953 PA
189, MCL 211.181 to 211.182, and the technology park development
act, 1984 PA 385, MCL 207.701 to 207.718. The initial assessed
value or current assessed value of property subject to a specific
local tax is the quotient of the specific local tax paid divided by
the ad valorem millage rate. However, after 1993, the state tax
commission shall prescribe the method for calculating the initial
assessed value and current assessed value of property for which a
specific local tax was paid in lieu of a property tax.
(ii) "State fiscal year" means the annual period commencing
ERE H03268'25 (H-2) hdyn9x


October 1 of each year.
(jj) "Tax increment revenues" means the amount of ad valorem
property taxes and specific local taxes attributable to the
application of the levy of all taxing jurisdictions on the captured
assessed value of eligible property within the district or, for
purposes of a certified technology park, a next Michigan
development area, or a certified alternative energy park, real or
personal property that is located within the certified technology
park, a next Michigan development area, or a certified alternative
energy park and included within the tax increment financing plan,
subject to the following requirements:
(i) Tax increment revenues include ad valorem property taxes
and specific local taxes attributable to the application of the
levy of all taxing jurisdictions, other than this state under the
state education tax act, 1993 PA 331, MCL 211.901 to 211.906, and
local or intermediate school districts, on the captured assessed
value of real and personal property in the development area for any
purpose authorized by this part.
(ii) Tax increment revenues include ad valorem property taxes
and specific local taxes attributable to the application of the
levy of this state under the state education tax act, 1993 PA 331,
MCL 211.901 to 211.906, and local or intermediate school districts
on the captured assessed value of real and personal property in the
development area in an amount equal to the amount necessary,
without regard to subparagraph (i), for the following purposes:
(A) To repay eligible advances, eligible obligations, and
other protected obligations.
(B) To fund or to repay an advance or obligation issued by or
on behalf of an authority to fund the cost of public facilities
ERE H03268'25 (H-2) hdyn9x


related to or for the benefit of eligible property located within a
certified technology park or a certified alternative energy park to
the extent the public facilities have been included in an agreement
under section 412a(3), 412b, or 412c(3), not to exceed 50%, as
determined by the state treasurer, of the amounts levied by this
state under the state education tax act, 1993 PA 331, MCL 211.901
to 211.906, and local and intermediate school districts for a
period, except as otherwise provided in this sub-subparagraph, not
to exceed 15 years, as determined by the state treasurer, if the
state treasurer determines that the capture under this sub-
subparagraph is necessary to reduce unemployment, promote economic
growth, and increase capital investment in the municipality.
authority is in compliance and in good standing with all applicable
department of treasury and Michigan economic development
corporation reporting requirements and the Michigan economic
development corporation affirms that the authority has resubmitted
its tax increment financing plan in alignment with this state's
economic development priorities. However, if all of the following
apply regarding the period of capture under this sub-subparagraph:
(I) If approved by the state treasurer and the president chief
executive officer of the Michigan economic development corporation,
a certified technology park, including a satellite, may capture
under this sub-subparagraph for an additional period of 5 years if,
before that capture, the authority agrees to additional reporting
requirements and modifies its tax increment financing plan to
include regional collaboration as determined by the state treasurer
and the president chief executive officer of the Michigan economic
development corporation. The retroactive approval of an additional
period of 5 years may occur after a capture under this sub-
ERE H03268'25 (H-2) hdyn9x


subparagraph for that additional period, if the other requirements
of this sub-subparagraph are satisfied.
(II) In addition, on approval of the state treasurer and the
president chief executive officer of the Michigan economic
development corporation, if a municipality that has created a
certified technology park that has entered into an agreement with
another authority that does not contain a certified technology park
to designate a distinct geographic area under section 412b, that
authority that has created the certified technology park and the
associated distinct geographic area a parent certified technology
park and a satellite may both capture under this sub-subparagraph
for an additional period of 15 years as determined by the state
treasurer and the president chief executive officer of the Michigan
economic development corporation.
(III) In addition to any additional periods under sub-sub-
subparagraphs (I) and (II), if approved by the state treasurer and
the chief executive officer of the Michigan economic development
corporation under section 412a(15), a certified technology park,
including a satellite, may capture under this sub-subparagraph for
an additional period of 15 years.
(IV) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this act, a
satellite is eligible for an extension under sub-sub-subparagraphs
(I) to (III) regardless of whether the parent certified technology
park obtains an extension.
(V) As used in this sub-subparagraph:
(1) "Parent certified technology park" means a certified
technology park that has a satellite.
(2) "Satellite" means a distinct geographic area designated as
a certified technology park under section 412b.
ERE H03268'25 (H-2) hdyn9x


(C) To fund the cost of public facilities related to or for
the benefit of eligible property located within a next Michigan
development area to the extent that the public facilities have been
included in a development plan, not to exceed 50%, as determined by
the state treasurer, of the amounts levied by this state under the
state education tax act, 1993 PA 331, MCL 211.901 to 211.906, and
local and intermediate school districts for a period not to exceed
15 years, as determined by the state treasurer, if the state
treasurer determines that the capture under this sub-subparagraph
is necessary to reduce unemployment, promote economic growth, and
increase capital investment in the authority district.authority is
in compliance and in good standing with all applicable department
of treasury and Michigan economic development corporation reporting
requirements and the Michigan economic development corporation
affirms that the authority has resubmitted its tax increment
financing plan in alignment with this state's economic development
priorities.
(iii) Tax increment revenues do not include any of the
following:
(A) Ad valorem property taxes or specific local taxes that are
excluded from and not made part of the tax increment financing
plan. Ad valorem personal property taxes or specific local taxes
associated with personal property may be excluded from and may not
be part of the tax increment financing plan.
(B) Ad valorem property taxes and specific local taxes
attributable to ad valorem property taxes excluded by the tax
increment financing plan of the authority from the determination of
the amount of tax increment revenues to be transmitted to the
authority.
ERE H03268'25 (H-2) hdyn9x


(C) Ad valorem property taxes exempted from capture under
section 404(3) or specific local taxes attributable to those ad
valorem property taxes.
(D) Ad valorem property taxes specifically levied for the
payment of principal and interest of obligations approved by the
electors or obligations pledging the unlimited taxing power of the
local governmental unit or specific local taxes attributable to
those ad valorem property taxes.
(E) The amount of ad valorem property taxes or specific taxes
captured by a downtown development authority under part 2, tax
increment finance authority under part 3, or brownfield
redevelopment authority under the brownfield redevelopment
financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670, if those
taxes were captured by these other authorities on the date that the
initial assessed value of a parcel of property was established
under this part.
(F) Ad valorem property taxes levied under 1 or more of the
following or specific local taxes attributable to those ad valorem
property taxes:
(I) The zoological authorities act, 2008 PA 49, MCL 123.1161
to 123.1183.
(II) The art institute authorities act, 2010 PA 296, MCL
123.1201 to 123.1229.
(III) Except as otherwise provided in section 404(3), ad
valorem property taxes or specific local taxes attributable to
those ad valorem property taxes levied for a separate millage for
public library purposes approved by the electors after December 31,
2016.
(iv) The amount of tax increment revenues authorized to be
ERE H03268'25 (H-2) hdyn9x


included under subparagraph (ii), and required to be transmitted to
the authority under section 413(1), from ad valorem property taxes
and specific local taxes attributable to the application of the
levy of the state education tax act, 1993 PA 331, MCL 211.901 to
211.906, or a local school district or an intermediate school
district on the captured assessed value of real and personal
property in a development area must be determined separately for
the levy by this state, each school district, and each intermediate
school district as the product of sub-subparagraphs (A) and (B):
(A) The percentage that the total ad valorem taxes and
specific local taxes available for distribution by law to this
state, a local school district, or an intermediate school district,
respectively, bears to the aggregate amount of ad valorem millage
taxes and specific taxes available for distribution by law to this
state, each local school district, and each intermediate school
district.
(B) The maximum amount of ad valorem property taxes and
specific local taxes considered tax increment revenues under
subparagraph (ii).
(kk) "Transit-oriented development" means infrastructure
improvements that are located within 1/2 mile of a transit station
or transit-oriented facility that promotes transit ridership or
passenger rail use as determined by the board and approved by the
municipality in which it is located.
(ll) "Transit-oriented facility" means a facility that houses a
transit station in a manner that promotes transit ridership or
passenger rail use.
(mm) "Urban township" means a township that meets 1 or more of
the following:
ERE H03268'25 (H-2) hdyn9x


(i) Meets all of the following requirements:
(A) Has a population of 20,000 or more, or has a population of
10,000 or more but is located in a county with a population of
400,000 or more.
(B) Adopted a master zoning plan before February 1, 1987.
(C) Provides sewer, water, and other public services to all or
a part of the township.
(ii) Meets all of the following requirements:
(A) Has a population of less than 20,000.
(B) Is located in a county with a population of 250,000 or
more but less than 400,000, and that county is located in a
metropolitan statistical area.
(C) Has within its boundaries a parcel of property under
common ownership that is 800 acres or larger and is capable of
being served by a railroad, and located within 3 miles of a limited
access highway.
(D) Establishes an authority before December 31, 1998.
(iii) Meets all of the following requirements:
(A) Has a population of less than 20,000.
(B) Has a state equalized valuation for all real and personal
property located in the township of more than $200,000,000.00.
(C) Adopted a master zoning plan before February 1, 1987.
(D) Is a charter township under the charter township act, 1947
PA 359, MCL 42.1 to 42.34.
(E) Has within its boundaries a combination of parcels under
common ownership that is 800 acres or larger, is immediately
adjacent to a limited access highway, is capable of being served by
a railroad, and is immediately adjacent to an existing sewer line.
(F) Establishes an authority before March 1, 1999.
ERE H03268'25 (H-2) hdyn9x


(iv) Meets all of the following requirements:
(A) Has a population of 13,000 or more.
(B) Is located in a county with a population of 150,000 or
more.
(C) Adopted a master zoning plan before February 1, 1987.
(v) Meets all of the following requirements:
(A) Is located in a county with a population of 1,000,000 or
more.
(B) Has a written agreement with an adjoining township to
develop 1 or more public facilities on contiguous property located
in both townships.
(C) Has a master plan in effect.
(vi) Meets all of the following requirements:
(A) Has a population of less than 10,000.
(B) Has a state equalized valuation for all real and personal
property located in the township of more than $280,000,000.00.
(C) Adopted a master zoning plan before February 1, 1987.
(D) Has within its boundaries a combination of parcels under
common ownership that is 199 acres or larger, is located within 1
mile of a limited access highway, and is located within 1 mile of
an existing sewer line.
(E) Has rail service.
(F) Establishes an authority before May 7, 2009.
(vii) Has joined an authority under section 403(2) that is
seeking or has entered into an agreement for a certified technology
park.
(viii) Has established an authority that is seeking or has
entered into an agreement for a certified alternative energy park.
Sec. 412a. (1) A municipality that has created an authority
ERE H03268'25 (H-2) hdyn9x


may apply to the Michigan economic development corporation for
designation of all or a portion of the authority district as a
certified technology park and to enter into an agreement governing
the terms and conditions of the designation. The form of the
application shall must be in a the form specified by the Michigan
economic development corporation and shall must include information
the Michigan economic development corporation determines necessary
to make the determinations required under this section.
(2) After receipt of an application, the Michigan economic
development corporation may designate, pursuant to an agreement
entered into under subsection (3), a certified technology park that
is determined by the Michigan economic development corporation to
satisfy 1 or more of the following criteria based on the
application:
(a) A demonstration of significant support from an institution
of higher education, a private research-based institute, or a
large, private corporate research and development center located
within the proximity of the proposed certified technology park, as
evidenced by, but not limited to, the following types of support:
(i) Grants of preferences for access to and commercialization
of intellectual property.
(ii) Access to laboratory and other facilities owned by or
under control of the institution of higher education or private
research-based institute.
(iii) Donations of services.
(iv) Access to telecommunication facilities and other
infrastructure.
(v) Financial commitments.
(vi) Access to faculty, staff, and students.
ERE H03268'25 (H-2) hdyn9x


(vii) Opportunities for adjunct faculty and other types of
staff arrangements or affiliations.
(b) A demonstration of a significant commitment on behalf of
the institution of higher education, private research-based
institute, or a large, private corporate research and development
center to the commercialization of research produced at the
certified technology park, as evidenced by the intellectual
property and, if applicable, tenure policies that reward faculty
and staff for commercialization and collaboration with private
businesses.
(c) A demonstration that the proposed certified technology
park will be developed to take advantage of the unique
characteristics and specialties offered by the public and private
resources available in the area in which the proposed certified
technology park will be located.
(d) The existence of or proposed development of a business
incubator within the proposed certified technology park that
exhibits the following types of resources and organization:
(i) Significant financial and other types of support from the
public or private resources in the area in which the proposed
certified technology park will be located.
(ii) A business plan exhibiting the economic utilization and
availability of resources and a likelihood of successful
development of technologies and research into viable business
enterprises.
(iii) A commitment to the employment of a qualified full-time
manager to supervise the development and operation of the business
incubator.
(e) The existence of a business plan for the proposed
ERE H03268'25 (H-2) hdyn9x


certified technology park that identifies its objectives in a
clearly focused and measurable fashion and that addresses the
following matters:
(i) A commitment to new business formation.
(ii) The clustering of businesses, technology, and research.
(iii) The opportunity for and costs of development of properties
under common ownership or control.
(iv) The availability of and method proposed for development of
infrastructure and other improvements, including telecommunications
technology, necessary for the development of the proposed certified
technology park.
(v) Assumptions of costs and revenues related to the
development of the proposed certified technology park.
(f) A demonstrable and satisfactory assurance that the
proposed certified technology park can be developed to principally
contain eligible property as defined by section 402(s)(iii) and (v).
(3) An authority and a municipality that incorporated the
authority may enter into an agreement with the Michigan economic
development corporation establishing the terms and conditions
governing the certified technology park. Upon On designation of the
certified technology park pursuant to the terms of the agreement,
the subsequent failure of any party to comply with the terms of the
agreement shall does not result in the termination or rescission of
the designation of the area as a certified technology park. The
agreement shall must include, but is not limited to, the following
provisions:
(a) A description of the area to be included within the
certified technology park.
(b) Covenants and restrictions, if any, upon on all or a
ERE H03268'25 (H-2) hdyn9x


portion of the properties contained within the certified technology
park and terms of enforcement of any covenants or restrictions.
(c) The financial commitments of any party to the agreement
and of any owner or developer of property within the certified
technology park.
(d) The terms of any commitment required from an institution
of higher education or private research-based institute for support
of the operations and activities at eligible properties within the
certified technology park.
(e) The terms of enforcement of the agreement, which may
include the definition of events of default, cure periods, legal
and equitable remedies and rights, and penalties and damages,
actual or liquidated, upon on the occurrence of an event of
default.
(f) The public facilities to be developed for the certified
technology park.
(g) The costs approved for public facilities under section
402(dd).402(ff).
(4) If the Michigan economic development corporation has
determined that a sale price or rental value at below market rate
will assist in increasing employment or private investment in the
certified technology park, the authority and municipality have
authority to determine the sale price or rental value for public
facilities owned or developed by the authority and municipality in
the certified technology park at below market rate.
(5) If public facilities developed pursuant to an agreement
entered into under this section are conveyed or leased at less than
fair market value or at below market rates, the terms of the
conveyance or lease shall include legal and equitable remedies and
ERE H03268'25 (H-2) hdyn9x


rights to assure the public facilities are used as eligible
property. Legal and equitable remedies and rights may include
penalties and actual or liquidated damages.
(6) Except as otherwise provided in this section, an agreement
designating a certified technology park may not be made after
December 31, 2002, but any agreement made on or before December 31,
2002 may be amended after that date. However, the Michigan economic
development corporation may enter into an agreement with a
municipality after December 31, 2002 and on or before December 31,
2005 if that municipality has adopted a resolution of interest to
create a certified technology park before December 31, 2002.
(7) The Michigan economic development corporation shall market
the certified technology parks and the certified business parks.
The Michigan economic development corporation and an authority may
contract with each other or any third party for these marketing
services.
(8) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (9), (10), and
(11), the Michigan economic development corporation shall not
designate more than 10 certified technology parks. For purposes of
this subsection only, 2 certified technology parks located in a
county that contains a city with a population of more than 750,000,
shall be counted 600,000 count as 1 certified technology park. Not
more than 7 of the certified technology parks designated under this
section may not include a firm commitment from at least 1 business
engaged in a high technology activity creating a significant number
of jobs.
(9) The Michigan economic development corporation may
designate an additional 5 certified technology parks after November
1, 2002 and before December 31, 2007. The Michigan economic
ERE H03268'25 (H-2) hdyn9x


development corporation shall not accept applications for the
additional certified technology parks under this subsection until
after November 1, 2002.
(10) The Michigan economic development corporation may
designate an additional 3 certified technology parks after February
1, 2008 and before December 31, 2008. The Michigan economic
development corporation shall not accept applications for the
additional certified technology parks under this subsection until
after February 1, 2008.
(11) The Michigan economic development corporation may
designate an additional 3 certified technology parks before March
31, 2013. It is the intent of the legislature that after the
additional 3 certified technology parks are designated under this
subsection, no additional certified technology parks shall be
designated under this section.
(12) The Michigan economic development corporation shall give
priority to applications that include new business activity.
(13) For an authority established by 2 or more municipalities
under sections 403(2) and 404(7), each municipality in which the
authority district is located by a majority vote of the members of
its governing body may make a limited tax pledge to support the
authority's tax increment bonds issued under section 14 or, if
authorized by the voters of the municipality, may pledge its full
faith and credit for the payment of the principal of and interest
on the bonds. The municipalities that have made a pledge to support
the authority's tax increment bonds may approve by resolution an
agreement among themselves establishing obligations each may have
to the other party or parties to the agreement for reimbursement of
all or any portion of a payment made by a municipality related to
ERE H03268'25 (H-2) hdyn9x


its pledge to support the authority's tax increment bonds.
(14) Not including certified technology parks designated under
subsection (8), but for certified technology parks designated under
subsections (9), (10), and (11) only, this state shall do all of
the following:
(a) Reimburse intermediate school districts each year for all
tax revenue lost that was captured by an authority for a certified
technology park designated by the Michigan economic development
corporation after October 3, 2002.
(b) Reimburse local school districts each year for all tax
revenue lost that was captured by an authority for a certified
technology park designated by the Michigan economic development
corporation after October 3, 2002.
(c) Reimburse the school aid fund from funds other than those
appropriated in section 411 11 of the state school aid act of 1979,
1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1611, for an amount equal to the reimbursement
calculations under subdivisions (a) and (b) and for all revenue
lost that was captured by an authority for a certified technology
park designated by the Michigan economic development corporation
after October 3, 2002. Foundation allowances calculated under
section 20 of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL
388.1620, shall not be reduced as a result of tax revenue lost that
was captured by an authority for a certified technology park
designated by the Michigan economic development corporation under
subsection (9), (10), or (11) after October 3, 2002.
(15) The state treasurer and the chief executive officer of
the Michigan economic development corporation may approve an
additional period of capture of taxes levied for school operating
purposes under section 402(jj)(ii)(B)(III), and the Michigan
ERE H03268'25 (H-2) hdyn9x


economic development corporation may extend the agreement under
subsection (3) for the additional period, if both of the following
requirements are met:
(a) The applicant, including a satellite, agrees to additional
reporting requirements as determined by the state treasurer and the
chief executive officer of the Michigan economic development
corporation.
(b) The operation of the certified technology park is in
compliance and in good standing with all applicable department of
treasury and Michigan economic development corporation reporting
requirements and the Michigan economic development corporation
affirms that the authority has resubmitted its tax increment
financing plan in alignment with this state's economic development
priorities. If the application is for a satellite or parent
certified technology park only, the determination under this
subdivision must be made with respect to the satellite or parent
certified technology park, as applicable.
(16) The Michigan economic development corporation may extend
the agreement under subsection (3) for an additional period of 15
years if the governing body of each municipality that established
the authority approves, by resolution, the extension, the authority
modifies its tax increment financing plan to provide for the
capture of only local taxes, and the modified tax increment
financing plan otherwise complies with this part. An extension
under this subsection is in addition to any other extensions
allowed under this part. An agreement may be extended not more than
2 times under this subsection.
(17) As used in this section:
(a) "Local taxes" means ad valorem property taxes and specific
ERE H03268'25 (H-2) hdyn9x


local taxes attributable to the application of the levy of all
taxing jurisdictions, other than taxes levied for school operating
purposes.
(b) "Parent certified technology park" means a certified
technology park that has a satellite.
(c) "Satellite" means a distinct geographic area designated as
a certified technology park under section 412b.
(d) "Taxes levied for school operating purposes" means ad
valorem property taxes and specific local taxes attributable to the
application of the levy of this state under the state education tax
act, 1993 PA 331, MCL 211.901 to 211.906, and local and
intermediate school districts.
Sec. 412b. (1) A municipality that has created an authority in
which a certified technology park has been designated under this
part may enter into an agreement with another authority that does
not contain a certified technology park to designate a distinct
geographic area within the authority district as a certified
technology park. The authority shall consider the advantages of the
unique characteristics and specialties offered by the public and
private resources available in the distinct geographic area, shall
consider the benefits to regional cooperation and collaboration,
and shall consider whether designating the additional distinct
geographic area adds value to the mission of the designated
certified technology park. The distinct geographic area is subject
to the provisions of section 412a(3), (4), and (5), (15), and (16).
The state treasurer shall not approve the capture of amounts levied
by the state under the state education tax act, 1993 PA 331, MCL
211.901 to 211.906, and by local and intermediate school districts
as permitted in section 402(jj)(ii)(B) for more than 9 distinct
ERE H03268'25 (H-2) hdyn9x


geographic areas designated under this section. In addition,
beginning on July 21, 2015, the state treasurer shall not approve
the capture of amounts described in this subsection unless the
application for approval of a distinct geographic area under this
subsection is also approved by the Michigan economic development
corporation as provided in subsection (2). A copy of the
designation shall must be filed with the Michigan economic
development corporation.
(2) Beginning on July 21, 2015, the Michigan economic
development corporation shall designate the distinct geographic
areas under subsection (1) pursuant to a competitive application
process that has an initial application period and a final
application period and that meets all of the following
requirements:
(a) The initial application period shall must begin on July
21, 2015 and end on October 1, 2015. All applications submitted
during the initial application period shall must be approved or
denied not later than November 1, 2015. The Michigan economic
development corporation may approve up to 3 applications as a
result of the initial application period. Applications The Michigan
economic development corporation shall not consider applications
submitted outside the initial application period shall not be
considered under this subdivision.
(b) The final application period shall must begin on January
1, 2016 and end on July 1, 2016. All applications submitted during
the final application period shall must be approved or denied by
September 1, 2016. The Michigan economic development corporation
may approve the remaining designations available under subsection
(1) as a result of the final application period. However, there is
ERE H03268'25 (H-2) hdyn9x


no requirement that the Michigan economic development corporation
is not required to make all 9 designations be made under this
section. Applications The Michigan economic development corporation
shall not consider applications submitted outside the final
application period shall not be considered under this subdivision.
(c) The Michigan economic development corporation shall
publish the application process and competitive criteria upon on
which applications will be evaluated on its website. If an
application does not meet the requirements of this section, the
application shall not be approved by the Michigan economic
development corporation shall not approve the application.
Final Page
ERE H03268'25 (H-2) hdyn9x